Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.065

Plans, programs, and projects—Approval by director.

(1) The commission shall develop and submit to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects concerning the following:

(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration of appropriate programs or projects within the commission's powers and duties;

(b) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects, market development projects, or both to the end that the marketing and utilization of apples may be encouraged, expanded, improved, or made more efficient; and

(c) The establishment and effectuation of, and/or support of industry organizations work regarding, market access project and programs, trade banner work and industry organization support.

(2) The director shall review the commission's programs to ensure that they properly benefit the people of the state of Washington and its economy and properly speak the message of the state.

(3) The commission, prior to the beginning of its fiscal year, shall prepare and submit to the director for approval its project and program plans and its budget on a fiscal period basis.

(4) The director shall strive to review and make a determination of all submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

[ 2004 c 178 s 8.]